Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 7. Specific Projects.

Sec. 42.40.550.
Extension of railroad to Fort Greely.

The corporation may acquire a transportation corridor between the existing railroad corridor and Fort Greely, Alaska, and construct a rail line within the corridor to provide rail service to the Fort Greely area and points between. The transportation corridor may be designated for a use identified under AS

42.40.350(b)

and other transportation and utility uses. The corporation may also acquire land along the corridor for use as rail land that can be developed for terminal, station, and maintenance facilities, switching yards, and any other purposes associated with the railroad utility corridor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 46 SLA 2004; am § 7 ch 64 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the Alaska Railroad Corporation to submit a report to the Resources Committees and Finance Committees of the legislature in 2019, 2020, and 2021 on its activities under this section, see sec. 23, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, deleted the last sentence, which read, “The corporation may provide financing for the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipping, and operation of the rail line and related facilities between the existing railroad corridor and Fort Greely, Alaska.”

Sec. 42.40.560.
North Slope natural gas pipeline.

History.

[Repealed, § 13 ch 64 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 42.40.570.
Kenai gasification project.

The corporation may participate in a project consisting of the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipping, and operation of real and personal property, including facilities and equipment for the transportation of coal from Healy to the northern Kenai Peninsula, and facilities and equipment for coal gasification and electrical power generation adjacent to the Agrium fertilizer plants in the northern Kenai Peninsula.

The corporation may participate in a project consisting of the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipping, and operation of real and personal property, including facilities and equipment, for the transportation of coal by rail from Healy to Port MacKenzie and thereafter by barge to the northern Kenai Peninsula.

The corporation may finance all or a portion of the projects described in (a) and (b) of this section through the issuance of its bonds.

History.

(§ 2 ch 65 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings, intent, and statement of purpose applicable to ch. 65, SLA 2007, the Act that added this section, see § 1, ch. 65, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.
For legislative authorization and approval of bonds that may be issued by the Alaska Railroad Corporation for the purposes set out in (a) and (b) of this section, including conditions and limitations applicable to the bonds for each of the purposes set out in (a) and (b) of this section, termination dates for authorizations of those bonds, and a declaration that the provision constitutes the legislative approval required under AS

42.40.285

, see §§ 5 and 6, ch. 65, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.